Utah statutes.
4-24-28.   Enforcement -- Brand inspector's powers delineated.

(1)  A brand inspector is empowered with the authority of a special function officer for the purpose of enforcing this chapter and such an inspector may, if deemed proper, stop any vehicle carrying livestock or livestock carcasses for the purpose of examining brands, marks, certificates of brand inspection, and bills of lading or bills of sale relating to the livestock in transit.

(2)  Brand inspectors may enter any premises where livestock are kept or maintained for the purpose of examining brands or marks.  If admittance is refused, the department may proceed immediately to obtain an ex parte warrant from the nearest court of competent jurisdiction to allow entry upon the premises for the purpose of examining brands or marks or other evidence of ownership.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1986 Special Session 2

